Maryland, session 2025, HB0518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0518*

HOUSE BILL 518
62.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS
SECTION, EACH BILL PASSED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT ESTABLISHES A
CRIMINAL OFFENSE SHALL INCLUDE AN EXPLICIT MENS REA REQUIREMENT FOR
EACH OFFENSE ESTABLISHED.
(B) AN EXPLICIT MENS REA REQUIREMENT IS NOT REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION IF THE LANGUAGE ESTABLISHING A CRIMINAL OFFENSE IN A BILL PASSED
BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY PLAINLY INDICATES A PURPOSE TO IMPOSE STRICT
LIABILITY FOR THE PROHIBITED CONDUCT DESCRIBED IN THE OFFENSE.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE AMENDMENT OF A CRIMINAL
OFFENSE THAT EXISTED ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Government
2–1262.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT,
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO THE SENATE JUDICIAL
PROCEEDINGS COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE JUDICIARY COMMITTEE ON CRIMINAL
LAWS IN THE STATE THAT DO NOT SPECIFY AN EXPLICIT MENS REA REQUIREMENT
FOR THE OFFENSE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Government
2–1505.
(e) (1) A fiscal note for a bill shall contain an estimate of the fiscal impact of
the bill on the revenues and expenditures of the State government and of local
governments:
(i) during the year in which the bill is to become effective and the
next 4 years after that year; and
(ii) if the full fiscal impact of a bill is not expected to occur during
those years, during each year until and the first year during which that impact is expected
to occur.

HOUSE BILL 518 3
(2) If a bill, as introduced or amended, imposes a mandate on a local
government unit, the fiscal note for the bill shall contain:
(i) a statement that clearly identifies the imposition of the mandate;
and
(ii) an estimate of the fiscal impact of the mandate and, if applicable
and if data is available, the effect on local property tax rates.
(3) If a bill, as introduced or amended, requires a mandated appropriation,
the fiscal note for the bill shall contain:
(i) a statement that clearly identifies the imposition of the
mandated appropriation; and
(ii) an estimate of the fiscal impact of the mandated appropriation.
(4) A FISCAL NOTE FOR A BILL THAT ESTABLISHES A CRIMINAL
OFFENSE SHALL CONTAIN:
(I) A STATEMENT THAT UNDER ARTICLE III, § 62 OF THE
MARYLAND CONSTITUTION, EACH BILL PASSED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
ESTABLISHING A CRIMINAL OFFENSE SHALL PROVIDE AN EXPLICIT MENS REA
REQUIREMENT FOR THE OFFENSE ESTABLISHED UNLESS THE BILL PLAINLY
INDICATES A PURPOSE TO IMPOSE STRICT LIABILITY FOR THE CONDUCT DESCRIBED
IN THE OFFENSE; AND
(II) AN ASSESSMENT OF WHETHER THE CRIMINAL OFFENSE
ESTABLISHED IN THE BILL INCLUDES AN EXPLICIT MENS REA REQUIREMENT.
(5) A fiscal note shall identify the sources of the information that the
Department used in preparing the estimates of fiscal impact.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the

HOUSE BILL 518
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Sections 6 and 8 of
this Act, Section 3 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the
constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 6 and 7 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.